Hawaii statutes.
§431:10H-236 Delivery of shopper's guide;
group and individual policies. (a) A long-term care insurance shopper's
guide in the format developed by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, or a guide developed or approved by the commissioner, shall be
provided to all prospective applicants of a long-term care insurance policy or
certificate.

(b) In the case of producer solicitations, a
producer shall deliver the shopper's guide prior to the presentation of an
application or enrollment form.

(c) In the case of direct response
solicitations, the shopper's guide must be presented in conjunction with
application or enrollment form.

(d) Life insurance policies containing
accelerated long-term care benefits are not required to furnish the above-referenced
guide, but shall furnish the policy summary required under sections 431:10H-106
to 431:10H-114. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 216, §24]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next